Utah statutes.
19-6-427.   Liability of any person under other laws -- Additional state and governmental immunity -- Exceptions.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), nothing in this part affects or modifies in any way:

(a)  the obligations or liability of any person under any other provision of this part or state or federal law, including common law, for damages, injury, or loss resulting from a release or substantial threat of a release of petroleum from an underground storage tank or a petroleum storage tank; or

(b)  the liability of any person for costs incurred except as provided in this part.

(2)  In addition to the governmental immunity granted in Title 63G, Chapter 7, Governmental Immunity Act of Utah, the state and its political subdivisions are not liable for actions performed under this  part except as a result of intentional misconduct or gross negligence including reckless, willful, or wanton misconduct.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

